Washington statutes.
RCW 43.04.100

Deposit of fees, penalties, and damages—Use.

All fees, penalties, and damages received under this chapter shall be paid to the secretary of state and with the exception of the filing fee authorized in RCW 43.04.040(2) shall be deposited by the secretary into the capitol furnishings preservation committee account created in RCW 27.48.040.

[ 2007 c 453 s 4; 1988 c 120 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—2007 c 453: See RCW 44.73.005.